Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. Oil and Hazardous Substance Municipal Impact Assistance.

Sec. 29.60.500.
Purpose and policy.

The legislature finds and declares that a major release of oil or hazardous substances into the environment presents a real and substantial threat to the economy and public welfare of the municipalities, villages, and school districts that are affected by the release and the resultant activities to contain and clean up the release.

The legislature concludes that it is in the best interest of the state and its citizens to provide a readily available fund for the payment of the expenses incurred by municipalities, villages, and school districts to mitigate the social and economic effects that arise out of a major release of oil or hazardous substances and resultant cleanup activities.

It is the intent of the legislature and declared to be the public policy of the state that money to defray the cost of social and economic effects on municipalities, villages, and school districts arising from a major release of oil or a hazardous substance and resultant cleanup activities and to pay for efforts to abate that release will be immediately available upon a determination that the release was sudden and that it exceeds 2,500 barrels of oil, or exceeds an amount of a hazardous substance that when released into the environment presents a real and substantial threat to the economy and public welfare of the municipalities, villages, or school districts affected by it.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.510.
Municipal impact grants authorized.

Subject to (b) of this section, the commissioner may use money from the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund to make grants to a municipality, village, or school district that is affected by the release or by the response to the release and that demonstrates that the release or response to the release involves extraordinary expenditures that are beyond the reasonable capability of the municipality, village, or school district to meet from the current revenue sources of the municipality, village, or school district if a release of oil exceeds 2,500 barrels of oil, or if a release of a hazardous substance exceeds an amount of a hazardous substance that, when released into the environment, presents a threat to the economy and public welfare of the municipalities, villages, and school districts affected by it at least equivalent in effect to the effect of a release of oil in an amount defined by this subsection.

For each release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance

for which the commissioner of environmental conservation may, under AS

46.08.045

, expend money from the oil and hazardous substance release response account in the fund, and subject to agreement with the commissioner of environmental conservation as to the amount of money in the fund that may be used by the department to make grants, the commissioner may expend not more than $10,000,000 of the unrestricted balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response account in the fund for grants for purposes described in AS

29.60.520

; if the commissioner and the commissioner of environmental conservation do not agree on the amount of money in the response account in the fund that may be used by the department to make grants under AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

for release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, the governor shall make the determination;

for which money may not be expended from the response account under (1) of this subsection, and subject to appropriation of money in the fund that may be used by the department to make grants, the commissioner may expend not more than the amount appropriated from the oil and hazardous substance release prevention account in the fund for grants for purposes described in AS

29.60.520

.

Notwithstanding the limitation of AS

37.07.080(e)

against the transfer of money between appropriations, when the commissioner and the commissioner of environmental conservation have agreed to the amount of money in the oil and hazardous substance release response account that may be used by the department to make grants, or when that determination has been made by the governor, the commissioner of environmental conservation shall promptly transfer that amount to the department for use under AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

.

For money that has been transferred under (c) of this section, if within any one-year period thereafter the commissioner does not use the money to make a grant under AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

, the commissioner shall return the unexpended amount transferred under (c) of this section to the oil and hazardous substance release response account of the fund.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.520.
Purposes of municipal impact grants.

A grant made under AS

29.60.510

may be made

only for

provision of subsistence resources on which the residents of the municipality, village, or school district rely for subsistence needs;

the additional costs of a reasonable and appropriate function or service, including administrative expenses for the incremental costs of providing the function or service, limited to:

public health and welfare functions and services, including hospital, clinic, and emergency medical services; alcohol, drug abuse, and mental health services; family support services; and the operation of waste disposal systems and water quality improvement systems;

public safety functions and services, including police protection, search and rescue, and fire protection;

public utility functions and services, including the operation of electric generating plants and distribution systems, water supply systems, telephone systems, and fuel distribution systems; and

housing functions and services, limited to leasing or making other arrangements for temporary housing to be occupied by persons associated with containment or cleanup of the release;

costs associated with leasing transportation facilities for use in activities associated with the containment or cleanup;

costs of repair or replacement of equipment or a capital asset associated with a function or service set out in (B) of this paragraph the useful life of which has been substantially reduced by use associated with the containment or cleanup; and

to compensate the municipality, village, or school district for

the reduction of revenue attributable to the release of the oil or hazardous substance; and

the actual costs of projects or activities that are delayed or lost because of the efforts of the municipality, village, or school district responding to the release or associated with the containment or cleanup of oil or the hazardous substance.

If money received under this section is used for a capital expenditure, the commissioner may require the municipality, village, or school district that acquired the item as a capital expenditure to transfer it to the state at the end of the period during which the item is actually used for spill response if the commissioner finds that retention of the item would confer an inappropriate benefit on the municipality, village, or school district.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.530.
Criteria to evaluate grant applications.

In determining whether an expenditure or proposed expenditure by a municipality, village, or school district is eligible for a grant under AS

29.60.510

, the department shall consider the

degree to which the effect on the municipality, village, or school district is directly caused by the oil or hazardous substance release or the response to the release;

availability of money to the recipient from other sources that can meet the costs of providing the functions or services; and

severity of the effect addressed in the grant application.

The department may reject an application for a grant under AS

29.60.510

or approve an application for a grant in an amount that is less than the amount requested by a municipality, village, or school district if the department determines that payment of the amount requested is not warranted under (a) of this section.

The department shall adopt, by regulation, criteria by which to rank all or a portion of applications for the purpose of establishing the priority order of awarding grants if money requested by eligible municipalities, villages, and school districts under this section exceeds the amount available. The criteria must be based on the elements set out in (a) of this section. If the total amount of money requested by eligible municipalities, villages, and school districts under this section exceeds the amount available, the department shall rank applications for the purpose of establishing the priority order of awarding grants in accordance with the regulations.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.540.
Limitations on uses of grants by municipalities and villages.

A municipality may not use a grant made under AS

29.60.510

to reduce current municipal tax rates or to retire its existing bonded indebtedness.

Money received by a municipality, village, or school district under AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

may not be used for a capital improvement, as that term is defined in AS

46.08.900

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.550.
Records.

The department shall maintain records showing the income and expenses of grants made under AS

29.60.510

, and shall develop procedures governing the expenditure of, and accounting for, money expended.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991)

Sec. 29.60.560.
Impact assessment and remedial plans.

For each disaster emergency declared by the governor under AS

26.23.020

based on a release of oil or a hazardous substance or for each other release of oil or a hazardous substance for which money may be expended under AS

46.08.040

, the commissioner, after consulting with and securing the written approval of the attorney general and after consulting with other state agencies, shall

make an assessment of the social and economic effects of the release of the oil or hazardous substance;

develop a plan to

recover the cost of release-related expenditures; and

mitigate the social and economic effects of the release of the oil or hazardous substance on the municipalities, the villages, the school districts, and the region in which the discharge occurs.

The commissioner may make the assessment and plans required by (a) of this section by

using staff of the department;

contracting with a municipality or other entity; or

authorizing a municipality or other entity to perform that work and supporting that effort by a grant.

Only one assessment and one plan may be completed under this section for each declaration of a disaster emergency.

The commissioner may pay the costs of the assessment, the plan, and the recovery of the cost of release-related expenditures from money available in the fund.

Expenditures made under this section may be made only from the amount transferred to the commissioner under AS

29.60.510(c)

, unless

the commissioner and the commissioner of environmental conservation mutually agree that payment may be made from money in the oil and hazardous substance release response account in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund not transferred under AS

29.60.510(c)

; or

the commissioner pays them from another source.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am §§ 7, 8 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.60.590.
Regulations.

The commissioner and the commissioner of environmental conservation shall jointly develop and adopt regulations that are necessary to implement the purposes of AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991)

Sec. 29.60.599.
Definitions.

In AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

,

“barrel” when used with reference to oil has the meaning given in AS

43.20.144

;

“containment and cleanup” has the meaning given in AS

46.08.900

;

“disaster emergency” means a disaster declared by the governor under AS

26.23.020

;

“fund” means the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund established by AS

46.08.010

;

“hazardous substance” has the meaning given in AS

46.09.900

;

“oil” and “release” have the meanings given in AS

46.08.900

;

“school district” means a borough school district, a city school district, or a regional educational attendance area under AS 14;

“service”

means

a function performed or service provided by a municipality under a duty or power authorized by this title or by another provision of law authorizing a municipality to perform functions or provide services;

a comparable function performed or service provided by a village; or

a function performed or service provided by a school district;

includes functions not previously performed and services not previously provided by the municipality or village;

“village” means a place within the unorganized borough or within a borough if the power, function, or service for which a grant application is submitted under AS

29.60.500

—

29.60.599

is not exercised or provided by the borough on an areawide or nonareawide basis at the time the grant application is submitted, that

has irrevocably waived, in a form approved by the Department of Law, any claim of sovereign immunity that might arise in connection with the use of grant money under this chapter; and

has

a council organized under 25 U.S.C. 476 (sec. 16 of the Indian Reorganization Act);

a traditional village council recognized by the United States as eligible for federal aid to Indians; or

a council recognized by the commissioner under regulations adopted by the department to determine and give official recognition of village entities under AS

44.33.755(b)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1991; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 30 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 37 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (7) enacted as (9). Renumbered in 1994, at which time former (7) and (8) were renumbered as (8) and (9) respectively.

In 1998, in paragraph (1), “in AS

43.20.072

” was substituted for “by AS

43.20.072

(g)” to reflect the 1998 relettering of AS 43.20.072(g).

In 2012, in paragraph (1), “AS

43.20.144

” was substituted for “AS

43.20.072

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

43.20.072

.